Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 5 Allocation of Disbursements During Administration of Trust

Editor’s notes.

The existing provisions of Article 18 were designated as Part 5 of Article 17 by Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 16, effective May 12, 2011.

53-12-450.
Disbursements from income.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from income:

One-half of the regular compensation of the trustee and of any person providing investment advisory or custodial services to the trustee;

One-half of all court costs, attorney’s fees, and other fees and expenses for accountings, judicial proceedings, or other matters that involve both the income and remainder interests;

All of the other ordinary expenses incurred in connection with the administration, management, or preservation of trust property and the distribution of income, including interest, ordinary repairs, regularly recurring taxes assessed against principal, and court costs, attorney’s fees, and other fees and expenses of a proceeding or other matter that concerns primarily the income interest; and

Recurring premiums on insurance covering the loss of a principal asset or the loss of income from or use of the asset.

Any of the above disbursements made in connection with judicial proceedings may be varied by the order of the court.

All other disbursements shall be made from principal.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-450

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-451.
Disbursements from principal.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from principal:

The remaining one-half of the disbursements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 53-12-450;

All of the trustee’s compensation calculated on principal as a fee for acceptance, distribution, or termination and disbursements made to prepare property for sale;

Payments on the principal of a trust debt;

Court costs, attorney’s fees, and other fees and expenses of a proceeding that concerns primarily principal, including a proceeding to construe the trust or to protect the trust or its property;

Premiums paid on a policy of insurance not described in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Code Section 53-12-450, of which the trust is the owner and beneficiary;

Estate, inheritance, and other transfer taxes, including penalties, apportioned to the trust; and

Disbursements related to environmental matters, including reclamation, assessing environmental conditions, remedying and removing environmental contamination, monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances, preventing future releases of substances, collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially liable for the costs of those activities, penalties imposed under environmental laws or regulations and other payments made to comply with those laws or regulations, statutory or common law claims by third parties, and defending claims based on environmental matters.

Any of the disbursements provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section made in connection with judicial proceedings may be varied by the order of the court.

If a principal asset is encumbered with an obligation that requires income from that asset to be paid directly to the creditor, the trustee shall transfer from principal to income an amount equal to the income paid to the creditor in reduction of the principal balance of such obligation.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-451

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 17/SB 134.

53-12-452.
Transfers from income to principal for depreciation.

As used in this Code section, the term “depreciation” means a reduction in value due to wear, tear, decay, corrosion, or gradual obsolescence of a fixed asset having a useful life of more than one year.

A trustee may transfer to principal a reasonable amount of the net cash receipts from a principal asset that is subject to depreciation but shall not transfer any amount for depreciation:

Of that portion of real property used or available for use by a beneficiary as a residence or of tangible personal property held or made available for the personal use or enjoyment of a beneficiary;

During the administration of a decedent’s estate; or

Under this Code section if the trustee is accounting under Code Section 53-12-412 for the business or activity in which the asset is used.

An amount transferred to principal need not be held as a separate fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-452

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 18/SB 134.

53-12-453.
Transfers from income to reimburse principal.

Wherever a charge that is properly allocable to income has been made or is expected to be made from principal because of the unusually large nature of the charge or otherwise, the trustee may transfer an appropriate amount from income to principal in one or more accounting periods to reimburse principal or to provide a reserve for future principal disbursements.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-453

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-454.
Income taxes.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to income shall be paid from income.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to principal shall be paid from principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing authority.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee on the trust’s share of an entity’s taxable income shall be paid:

From income to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated only to income;

From principal to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated only to principal;

Proportionately from principal and income to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated to both income and principal; and

From principal to the extent that the tax exceeds the total receipts from the entity.

After applying subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section, the trustee shall adjust income or principal receipts to the extent that its taxes are reduced because it receives a deduction for payments made to a beneficiary.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-454

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-455.
Adjustments between principal and income because of taxes.

A fiduciary may make adjustments between principal and income to offset the shifting of economic interests or tax benefits between income beneficiaries and remainder beneficiaries which arise from:

Elections and decisions, other than those described in subsection (b) of this Code section, that the fiduciary makes from time to time regarding tax matters;

An income tax or any other tax that is imposed upon the fiduciary or a beneficiary as a result of a transaction involving or a distribution from the estate or trust; or

The ownership by an estate or trust of an interest in an entity whose taxable income, whether or not distributed, is includable in the taxable income of the estate, trust, or a beneficiary.

If the amount of an estate tax marital deduction or charitable contribution deduction is reduced because a fiduciary deducts an amount paid from principal for income tax purposes instead of deducting it for estate tax purposes, and as a result estate taxes paid from principal are increased and income taxes paid by an estate, trust, or beneficiary are decreased, each estate, trust, or beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in income tax shall reimburse the principal from which the increase in estate tax is paid. The total reimbursement shall equal the increase in the estate tax to the extent that the principal used to pay the increase would have qualified for a marital deduction or charitable contribution deduction but for the payment. The proportionate share of the reimbursement for each estate, trust, or beneficiary whose income taxes are reduced shall be the same as its proportionate share of the total decrease in income tax. An estate or trust shall reimburse principal from income.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-455

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.